Illinois, session 104th, HB3916.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, are appropriated to the Department of 7Public Health for the objects and purposes hereinafter named:8Payable from the General Revenue Fund:9  For Personal Services............................85,684,10010  For State Contributions11   to Social Security...............................6,554,40012  For Operational Expenses.........................36,437,20013    Total                                        $128,675,70014DIRECTOR'S OFFICE15Payable from the General Revenue Fund:16  For Costs and Administrative Expenses 17   Associated with the Data Governance 18   and Organization to Support 19   Equity and Racial Justice Act 20   Data Initiative....................................800,00021  For All Costs Associated with Data 22   System Modernization and23   Replacement of Critical Information  HB3916- 2 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1   Technology Systems .............................15,000,0002  For All Costs Associated with Responding3   to Emerging Public Health Threats, 4   Including Prior Years' Costs.....................8,500,0005  For All Costs Associated with6   Public Health Communications.....................5,000,0007  For Expenses Related to Refugee Health............1,500,0008  For Expenses Related to the9   Homelessness Morbidity and 10   Mortality Report...................................400,00011    Total                                         $31,200,00012  Payable from the Public Health Services Fund: 13  For Expenses of Implementing Federal Awards14   Including Testing and Services Performed by15   Local Health Providers, Including Prior16   Years' Costs...................................150,000,00017  For Expenses Associated with18   Support of Federally Funded Public19   Health Programs....................................300,00020  For Operational Expenses to Support21   Refugee Health Care................................514,00022  For Grants for the Development of23   Refugee Health Care..............................1,950,00024    Total                                        $152,764,00025Payable from the Public Health Special  26 State Projects Fund:  HB3916- 3 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1  For Expenses of Public Health Programs...........49,065,000 2    Section 10. The following named amounts, or so much 3thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 4Department of Public Health as follows:5REFUNDS6Payable from the General Revenue Fund..................13,8007Payable from the Public Health Services Fund...........75,0008Payable from the Maternal and Child 9 Health Services Block Grant Fund.......................5,00010Payable from the Preventive Health and 11 Health Services Block Grant Fund.......................5,00012    Total                                             $98,800 13    Section 15. The following named amounts, or so much 14thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 15Department of Public Health for the objects and purposes 16hereinafter named:17OFFICE OF FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION18Payable from the Metabolic Screening19 and Treatment Fund:20  For Operational Expenses for Maintaining21   Laboratory Billings and Receivables................300,00022Payable from the Tobacco Settlement Recovery Fund:23  For Expenses Associated with the 24   Modernization of Financial Processes...............500,000   HB3916- 4 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1    Section 20. The following named amounts, or so much 2thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 3Department of Public Health for the objects and purposes 4hereinafter named:5DIVISION OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY6Payable from the General Revenue Fund:7  For Expenses Associated with the Childhood8   Immunization Program...............................156,2009Payable from the Public Health Services Fund:10  For Expenses Associated11   with Support of Federally12   Funded Public Health Programs....................2,500,000 13    Section 25. The following named amounts, or so much 14thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 15Department of Public Health for the objects and purposes 16hereinafter named:17OFFICE OF POLICY, PLANNING AND STATISTICS18Payable from the General Revenue Fund:19  For Expenses of the Adverse Pregnancy20   Outcomes Reporting Systems (APORS) Program21   and the Adverse Health Care Event22   Reporting and Patient Safety Initiative..........1,017,40023  For Expenses of State Cancer Registry,24   Including Matching Funds for National  HB3916- 5 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1   Cancer Institute Grants............................147,4002  For Expenses Associated with Opioid3   Overdose Prevention..............................1,625,0004  For All Costs Associated with Access 5   to Primary Health Care Services Programs 6   According to the Underserved Physician 7   Workforce Act....................................1,000,0008  For Grants and Administrative Expenses9   Associated with the Equity and 10   Representation in Health Care Act Health 11   Care Work Force Repayment and Scholarship12   Programs.........................................3,000,00013Payable from the Rural/Downstate Health Access Fund:14  For Expenses Related to J-1 Visa Waiver 15   Applications.......................................175,00016Payable from the Public Health Services Fund:17  For All Costs Associated with18   Policy, Planning, and Statistics19   Programs, Including Prior Years' Costs..........29,845,10020  For Expenses for Rural Health Centers to21   Expand the Availability of Primary22   Health Care......................................2,000,00023  For Operational Expenses of Maintaining24   the Vital Records System.........................2,000,00025  For Operational Expenses to Develop a26   Health Care Provider Recruitment and  HB3916- 6 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1   Retention Program..................................337,1002  For Grants to Develop a Health 3   Care Provider Recruitment and4   Retention Program..................................450,0005  For Grants to Develop a Health Professional6   Educational Loan Repayment Program...............1,000,0007Payable from the Hospital Licensure Fund:8  For Expenses Associated with 9   the Illinois Adverse Health10   Care Events Reporting Law for an11   Adverse Health Care Event Reporting System12   and Patient Safety and Quality Initiatives.......3,000,00013Payable from Community Health Center Care Fund:14  For Expenses for Access to Primary Health15   Care Services Program per the Underserved Health16   Care Provider Workforce Act........................350,00017Payable from Illinois Health Facilities Planning Fund:18  For Expenses of the Health Facilities19   And Services Review Board........................1,600,00020  For Department Expenses in Support21   of the Health Facilities and Services22   Review Board.....................................1,200,00023Payable from the Long-Term Care Provider Fund:24  For Expenses of Identified Offenders25   Assessment and Other Public Health and26   Safety Activities................................2,000,000  HB3916- 7 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1Payable from the Regulatory Evaluation and Basic 2 Enforcement Fund:3  For Expenses of the Alternative Health Care4   Delivery Systems Program............................75,0005Payable from Death Certificate 6 Surcharge Fund:7  For Expenses of Statewide Database8   of Death Certificates and Distributions9   of Funds to Governmental Units,10   Pursuant to the Vital Records Act................2,500,00011  For Expenses of the Corner Training Board...........500,00012Payable from the Illinois Adoption Registry 13 and Medical Information Exchange Fund:14  For Expenses Associated with the15   Adoption Registry and Medical Information16   Exchange...........................................200,00017Payable from the Tobacco Settlement Recovery Fund:18  For Costs Associated with the Modernization19   of the iQuery System...............................300,00020  For Grants for the Community Health Center21   Expansion Program and Healthcare22   Workforce Providers in Health23   Professional Shortage Areas (HPSAs)24   in Illinois......................................1,100,00025Payable from the Preventive Health and Health 26 Services Block Grant Fund:  HB3916- 8 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1  For Expenses of Preventive Health and Health2   Services Needs Assessment........................3,500,0003Payable from Illinois State Podiatric Disciplinary Fund:4  For Expenses of the Podiatric Scholarship5   and Residency Act..................................100,000 6    Section 30. The following named amounts, or so much 7thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 8Department of Public Health for the objects and purposes 9hereinafter named:10OFFICE OF HEALTH PROMOTION11Payable from the General Revenue Fund:12  For Expenses of Sudden Infant Death Services Inc.13   of IL(SIDS) Program................................244,40014  For Expenses Related to an Alzheimer's15   Disease Research, Care and Support Program.......2,000,00016  For Expenses Related to a Suicide Prevention,17   Education, and Treatment Program...................750,00018  For All Costs Associated with the Community19   Health Worker Program............................2,000,00020  For Expenses for the University of21    Illinois Sickle Cell Clinic.......................483,90022  For Deposit into the Sickle Cell23   Chronic Disease Fund.............................1,000,00024  For a grant to the National Kidney25   Foundation of Illinois for Kidney Disease  HB3916- 9 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1   Care Services......................................550,0002  For Grants to Northwestern University3   for the Illinois Violent Death Reporting4   System to Analyze Data, Identify Risk5   Factors and Develop Prevention Efforts..............76,7006  For Prostate Cancer Awareness.......................146,6007  For a Grant to the Advocate Illinois8   Masonic Medical Center for All Costs9   Associated with Mobile Dental Services.............375,00010  For Grants for Vision and Hearing11   Screening Programs.................................441,70012  For a Grant to the Oral Health Forum13   for All Costs Associated with14   Oral Health Programs...............................100,00015  For Grants and Administrative Costs Associated16   with Health Care Telementoring...................5,000,00017  For a Grant to the Dental Lifeline Network 18   to Provide Dental Care and Education................72,00019Payable from the Alzheimer's Disease Research,20   Care, and Support Fund:21  For Grants and Expenses Pursuant to the Alzheimer's22   Disease Research, Care, and Support Fund Act.......500,00023Payable from the Public Health Services Fund:24  For All Costs Associated With25   Health Promotion programs,26   Including Prior Years' Costs ....................3,674,400  HB3916- 10 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1  For Grants for Public Health Programs,2    Including Operational Expenses, including3    prior years' costs..............................9,530,0004Payable from the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Fund:5  For Expenses of the Medical 6   Cannabis Program.................................8,772,6007Payable from the Childhood Cancer Research Fund:8  For Grants and Administrative Expenses9  for Childhood Cancer Research........................75,00010Payable from the Epilepsy Treatment and Education11  Grants-in-Aid Fund:12  For Expenses of the Education and Treatment13    of Epilepsy........................................30,00014Payable from the Diabetes Research Checkoff Fund:15  For Expenses for the American Diabetes16   Association to Conduct Diabetes Research...........125,00017  For Expenses for Breakthrough T1D to18   Conduct Diabetes Research..........................125,00019Payable from the Sickle Cell Chronic Disease Fund:20  For Grants and Administrative Costs for the21   Awareness, Prevention, Care, and Treatment22   of Sickle Cell Disease...........................1,000,00023Payable from the Multiple Sclerosis Research Fund:24  For Grants to Conduct Multiple25   Sclerosis Research...............................1,000,00026Payable from the Autoimmune Disease Research Fund:  HB3916- 11 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1  For Grants and Administrative Expenses for Autoimmune2   Disease Research and Treatment......................60,0003Payable from the Prostate Cancer Research Fund:4  For Grants and Administrative Expenses5   for Prostate6   Cancer Research.....................................30,0007Payable from the Healthy Smiles Fund:8  For Expenses of the Healthy Smiles Program..........400,0009Payable from the DHS Private Resources Fund:10  For Expenses of Diabetes Research Treatment11   and Programs.......................................700,00012Payable from the Tobacco Settlement Recovery Fund:13  For All Costs Associated with14   Asthma Prevention................................3,000,00015  For Colorectal, Prostate, and 16   Lung Cancer Grants...............................2,000,00017  For Certified Local Health Department18   Grants for Health Protection Programs Including,19   but not Limited to, Infectious20   Diseases, Food Sanitation,21   Potable Water, Private Sewage22   and Anti-Smoking Programs........................5,000,00023  For a Grant to the American Lung Association24   for Operations of the Quitline...................5,100,00025  For Grants and Administrative Expenses for26   the Tobacco Use Prevention Program,  HB3916- 12 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1   BASUAH Program, and Asthma Prevention............1,060,0002Payable from the Public Health Federal Projects Fund:3  For expenses related to the Community Health4   Worker Certification and Reimbursement Act5   and for Purposes Stated in Public Act 102-4......1,500,0006Payable from the Maternal and Child7  Health Services Block Grant Fund:8  For Operational Expenses of Maternal and9   Child Health Programs..............................500,00010  For Grants for Maternal and Child Health11   Programs...........................................995,00012Payable from the Preventive Health13  and Health Services Block Grant Fund:14  For Expenses of Preventive Health and15   Health Services Programs.........................1,726,80016  For Grants for Prevention Initiative Programs17   Including Operational Expenses...................1,000,00018Payable from the Cannabis Regulation Fund:19  For Costs and Administrative Expenses20   of the Adult-Use Cannabis Program..................500,00021Payable from the Metabolic Screening and 22 Treatment Fund:23  For Operational Expenses for Metabolic24   Screening Follow-up Services.....................4,505,10025  For Grants for Metabolic Screening26   Follow-up Services...............................3,250,000  HB3916- 13 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1  For Grants for Free Distribution of Medical2   Preparations and Food Supplies...................5,175,0003Payable from the Hearing Instrument 4 Dispenser Examining and Disciplinary Fund:5  For Expenses Pursuant to the Hearing6   Instrument Consumer Protection Act.................400,000 7    Section 35. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 9Fund to the Department of Public Health for grants and 10administrative expenses to establish and implement health 11equity zones to confront the social and environmental factors 12that contribute to health and racial inequity. 13    Section 40. The following named amounts, or so much 14thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 15Department of Public Health for the objects and purposes 16hereinafter named:17OFFICE OF HEALTH CARE REGULATION18Payable from the Public Health Services Fund:19  For All Costs Associated with Health20   Care Regulation, Surveillance, and21   Monitoring, Including Prior Years' Costs........25,248,20022Payable from the Hospital Licensure Fund:23  For Expenses Associated with24  Hospital Inspections................................900,000  HB3916- 14 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1Payable from the Long Term Care 2 Monitor/Receiver Fund:3  For Expenses, Including Refunds,4   Related to Appointment of Long-Term Care5   Monitors and Receivers..........................40,950,0006Payable from the Home Care Services Agency 7 Licensure Fund:8  For Expenses of Home Care Services9   Agency Licensure.................................1,846,40010Payable from Equity in Long-term Care 11 Quality Fund:12  For Grants and Administrative Expenses13   to Assist Residents of Facilities Licensed Under the 14   Nursing Home Care Act............................8,000,00015Payable from the Regulatory Evaluation 16 and Basic Enforcement Fund:17  For Expenses of the Alternative Health18   Care Delivery Systems Program.......................75,00019Payable from the Health Facility Plan 20 Review Fund:21  For Expenses of Health Facility22   Plan Review Program and Hospital23   Network System, Including Refunds................2,227,00024Payable from Assisted Living and Shared 25 Housing Regulatory Fund:26  For Operational Expenses of the  HB3916- 15 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1   Assisted Living and Shared2   Housing Program, Pursuant to3   the Assisted Living and Shared4   Housing Act......................................3,300,000 5    Section 45. The following named amounts, or so much 6thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 7Department of Public Health for the objects and purposes 8hereinafter named:9OFFICE OF HEALTH PROTECTION10Payable from the General Revenue Fund:11  For Expenses Incurred for the Rapid12   Investigation and Control of13   Disease or Injury..................................448,50014  For Expenses of Environmental Health15   Surveillance and Prevention16   Activities, Including Mercury17   Hazards and West Nile Virus........................299,20018  For Expenses for Expanded Lab Capacity19   and Enhanced Statewide Communication20   Capabilities Associated with21   Homeland Security..................................322,60022  For Deposit into Lead Poisoning23   Screening, Prevention, and Abatement24   Fund.............................................6,000,00025  For Grants for Immunizations and  HB3916- 16 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1   Outreach Activities..............................4,157,1002  For a Grant to the Will County Public Health3   Department for All Costs Associated with4   Programmatic Services..............................335,0005Payable from the Food and Drug Safety Fund:6  For Expenses of Administering7   the Food and Drug Safety8   Program, Including Refunds.........................300,0009Payable from the Public Health Services Fund:10  For Expenses of Implementing Federal11   Awards, Including Services Performed by12   Local Health Providers, Including Prior13   Years' Costs....................................55,449,80014  For Expenses of Implementing Federal Awards15   Including Testing and Services Performed by16   Local Health Providers, Including Prior17   Years' Costs...................................550,000,00018    Total                                        $605,449,80019Payable from the Safe Bottled Water Fund:20  For Expenses for the Safe Bottled21   Water Program.......................................50,00022Payable from the Facility Licensing Fund:23  For Expenses, Including Refunds, of24   Environmental Health Programs....................3,500,00025Payable from the Illinois School Asbestos 26 Abatement Fund:  HB3916- 17 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1  For Expenses, Including Refunds, of2   Administering and Executing3   the Asbestos Abatement Act and4   the Federal Asbestos Hazard Emergency5   Response Act of 1986 (AHERA).....................1,200,0006Payable from the Emergency Public Health Fund:7  For Expenses of Mosquito Abatement in an8   Effort to Curb the Spread of West9   Nile Virus and Other Vector Borne Diseases.......5,100,00010Payable from the Public Health Water Permit Fund:11  For Expenses, Including Refunds,12   of Administering the Illinois Groundwater13   Protection Act.....................................100,00014Payable from the Used Tire Management Fund:15  For Expenses of Vector Control Programs,16   Including Mosquito Abatement.....................1,300,00017Payable from the Tattoo and Body Piercing 18 Establishment Registration Fund:19  For Expenses of Administering of20   Tattoo and Body Piercing Establishment21   Registration Program...............................605,00022Payable from the Lead Poisoning Screening, 23 Prevention, and Abatement Fund:24  For Expenses of the Lead Poisoning25   Screening, Prevention, and26   Abatement Program, Including Refunds.............8,414,600  HB3916- 18 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1  For Grants for the Lead Poisoning Screening2   and Prevention Program...........................5,500,0003Payable from the Tanning Facility Permit Fund:4  For Expenses to Administer the5   Tanning Facility Permit Act,6   Including Refunds..................................300,0007Payable from the Plumbing Licensure 8 and Program Fund:9  For Expenses to Administer and Enforce10   the Illinois Plumbing License Law,11   Including Refunds................................3,950,00012Payable from the Pesticide Control Fund:13  For Public Education, Research,14   and Enforcement of the Structural15   Pest Control Act...................................577,70016Payable from the Tobacco Settlement Recovery Fund:17  For Grants and Administrative Expenses18   Associated with a Pilot Project for19   Community-Based Tuberculosis Prevention,20   Follow-up, and Treatment...........................500,00021Payable from the Private Sewage Disposal 22 Program Fund:23  For Expenses of Administering the24   Private Sewage Disposal Program....................292,00025Payable from the Personal Property Tax26  Replacement Fund:  HB3916- 19 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1  For Local Health Protection Grants2   to Certified Local Health Departments3   for Health Protection Programs Including,4   but not Limited to, Infectious5   Diseases, Food Sanitation,6   Potable Water and Private Sewage................20,098,5007Payable from the Public Health Federal 8 Projects Fund:9  For Grants and Administrative Expenses10   of Health Information Technology Activities11   and Electronic Health Records....................4,000,000 12    Section 50. The sum of $4,000,000, or so much thereof as 13may be necessary, is appropriated from the Renewable Energy 14Resources Trust Fund to the Department of Public Health for 15deposit into the Lead Poisoning Screening, Prevention, and 16Abatement Fund. 17    Section 55. The following named amounts, or so much 18thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 19Department of Public Health for expenses of programs related 20to Acquired Immunodeficiency Syndrome (AIDS) and Human 21Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV):22OFFICE OF HEALTH PROTECTION: AIDS/HIV23No less than one-half (50%) of all funds appropriated in any 24fiscal year to the Department of Public Health's Office of   HB3916- 20 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1Health Protection: AIDS/HIV Division shall be used for 2expenses pursuant to HIV/AIDS programs serving minority 3populations.4Payable from the General Revenue Fund:5  For Expenses of AIDS/HIV Education,6   Drugs, Services, Counseling, Testing,7   Outreach to Minority Populations; Costs8   Associated with Correctional Facilities Counseling,9   Testing Referral, and Partner Notification10   (CTRPN); and Patient and Worker11    Notification...................................25,562,40012  For Grants and Other Expenses for13   the Prevention and Treatment of14   HIV/AIDS and the Creation of an HIV/AIDS15   Service Delivery System to Reduce the16   Disparity of HIV Infection and AIDS Cases17   Between African-Americans and Other18   Population Groups................................4,000,00019  For Grants and Administrative Expenses for20   Housing Opportunities for Persons with21   AIDS Program.......................................720,00022Payable from the Public Health Services Fund:23  For Expenses of Programs for Prevention24   of AIDS/HIV, Including Prior years' Costs........7,250,00025  For Expenses for Surveillance Programs and26   Seroprevalence Studies  HB3916- 21 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1   of AIDS/HIV, Including2   Prior Years' Costs...............................2,750,0003  For Expenses Associated with the4   Ryan White Comprehensive AIDS5   Resource Emergency Act of6   1990 (CARE) and Other AIDS/HIV Services,7   Including Prior Years' Costs...................100,000,0008    Total                                        $110,000,0009Payable from the Quality of Life Endowment Fund:10  For Grants and Expenses Associated11   with HIV/AIDS Prevention and Education...........1,000,000 12    Section 60. The sum of $15,000,000, or so much thereof as 13may be necessary, is appropriated from the African-American 14HIV/AIDS Response Fund to the Department of Public Health for 15grants and administrative expenses associated with the 16prevention and treatment of HIV/AIDS and the creation of an 17HIV/AIDS service delivery system to reduce the disparity of 18HIV infection and AIDS cases among African-Americans for 19purposes allowed by Section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan 20Act of 2021 and any associated federal guidance, including 21prior years' costs. 22    Section 65. The sum of $5,500,000, or so much thereof as 23may be necessary, is appropriated to the Department of Public 24Health from the General Revenue Fund for expenses of programs   HB3916- 22 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1related to the Acquired Immunodeficiency Syndrome (AIDS) and 2Human Immunodeficiency Virus (HIV) and specifically to the 3Getting to Zero-Illinois (GTZ) plan to end the HIV epidemic by 42030. 5    Section 70. The following named amounts, or so much 6thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 7Department of Public Health for the objects and purposes 8hereinafter named:9PUBLIC HEALTH LABORATORIES10Payable from the General Revenue Fund:11  For Operational Expenses to Provide12   Clinical and Environmental Public13   Health Laboratory Services.......................6,389,30014Payable from the Public Health Services Fund:15  For All Costs Associated with16   Public Health Laboratories,17   Including Prior Years' Costs ....................8,268,90018Payable from the Public Health Laboratory 19 Services Revolving Fund:20  For Expenses, Including21   Refunds, to Administer Public22   Health Laboratory Programs and23   Services.........................................6,000,00024Payable from the Lead Poisoning 25 Screening, Prevention, and Abatement Fund:  HB3916- 23 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1  For Expenses, Including2   Refunds, of Lead Poisoning Screening,3   Prevention, and Abatement Program................1,678,1004Payable from the Metabolic Screening 5 and Treatment Fund:6  For Expenses, Including7   Refunds, of Testing and Screening8   for Metabolic Diseases..........................16,100,300 9    Section 75. The following named amounts, or as much 10thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 11Department of Public Health for the objects and purposes 12hereinafter named:13OFFICE OF WOMEN'S HEALTH14Payable from the General Revenue Fund:15  For Expenses for Breast and Cervical16   Cancer Screenings, Minority Outreach,17   and Other Related Activities....................14,512,40018  For Expenses of the Women's Health19   Promotion Programs.................................682,50020  For Expenses associated with School Health 21   Centers..........................................4,551,10022  For Expenses associated with the Maternal 23   And Child Health Title V Program.................4,800,00024  For All Costs Associated with Pediatric25   Mental Health Training...........................2,000,000  HB3916- 24 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1  For Expenses Related to Establishing2   a Reproductive Health Navigation3   Hotline, Training Programs, and4   Consultation Program and for 5   Purposes Stated in Public Act 102-1117..........18,000,0006  For Grants for the Extension and Provision7   of Perinatal Services for Premature8   and High-Risk Infants and their Mothers..........1,002,7009  For Grants and Administrative Expenses10   for Family Planning Programs.....................5,823,40011  For Security Grants to Free Standing12   Reproductive Health Care Clinics.................2,000,00013    Total                                         $53,372,10014Payable from the Penny Severns Breast, Cervical, 15 and Ovarian Cancer Research Fund:16  For Grants for Breast and Cervical17   Cancer Research....................................600,00018Payable from the Public Health Services Fund:19  For Expenses of Federally Funded Women's20   Health Programs, Including Prior21   Years' Costs.....................................5,570,80022  For Expenses associated with Maternal and23   Child Health Programs, Including Prior24   Years' Costs....................................15,000,00025  For Grants for Breast and Cervical26   Cancer Screenings, Including  HB3916- 25 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1   Prior Years' Costs...............................7,000,0002Payable from the Carolyn Adams Ticket 3 For The Cure Grant Fund:4  For Grants and Related Expenses to5   Public or Private Entities in Illinois6   for the Purpose of Funding Research7   Concerning Breast Cancer and for8   Funding Services for Breast Cancer Victims.......2,000,0009Payable from the Mammogram Fund:10  For Grants and Administrative Expenses of11   Patient Navigation Services........................117,00012Payable from Tobacco Settlement Recovery Fund:13  For Costs Associated with14   Children's Health Programs.......................2,229,70015Payable from the Maternal and Child Health 16 Services Block Grant Fund:17  For Expenses Associated with Maternal and18   Child Health Programs, Including19   Prior Years' Costs..............................11,000,00020  For Grants to the Chicago Department of21   Health for Maternal and Child Health22   Services.........................................6,000,00023  For Expenses incurred by the Board of24   Trustees of the University of Illinois25   Division of Specialized Care for Children,26   Including Prior Years' Costs....................10,000,000  HB3916- 26 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1  For Grants for the Extension and Provision2   of Perinatal Services for Premature and3   High-risk Infants and their Mothers..............3,000,000 4    Section 80. The sum of $4,000,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Public Health for grants and 7administrative expenses associated with the Birth Equity 8Initiative, including, but not limited to support and capacity 9building for community-based women's health providers, the 10development of an inventory of need and assets, an 11implementation plan to increase equitable access to 12community-based health providers, and the design of health 13navigation tools. 14    Section 85. The following named amounts, or so much 15thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the 16Department of Public Health for the objects and purposes 17hereinafter named:18OFFICE OF PREPAREDNESS AND RESPONSE19Payable from the Public Health Services Fund:20  For Expenses of Federally Funded21   Bioterrorism Preparedness22   Activities and Other Public Health23   Emergency Preparedness,24   Including Prior Years' Costs....................80,000,000  HB3916- 27 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1Payable from the Stroke Data Collection Fund:2  For Expenses Associated with3   Stroke Data Collection.............................400,0004Payable from the Heartsaver AED Fund:5  For Expenses Associated with the6   Heartsaver AED Program..............................50,0007Payable from the Trauma Center Fund:8  For Expenses of Administering the9   Distribution of Payments to10   Trauma Centers...................................2,000,00011Payable from the EMS Assistance Fund:12  For Expenses of Administering the13   Distribution of Payments from the14   EMS Assistance Fund, Including Refunds...........1,000,00015Payable from the Spinal Cord Injury Paralysis 16 Cure Research Trust Fund:17  For Grants for Spinal Cord Injury Research..........500,000 18    Section 90. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may 19be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of business 20on June 30, 2025, from an appropriation made for such purpose 21in Article 70, Section 95 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 22is reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to the 23Department of Public Health for a grant to the Southside Help 24Center for operating expenses, including prior years' costs.   HB3916- 28 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1    Section 95. The sum of $250,000, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of business 3on June 30, 2025, from a reappropriation made for such purpose 4in Article 70, Section 100 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 5is reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to the 6Department of Public Health for a grant to the Will County 7Health Department for costs associated with an overdose 8prevention program, including FDA-approved 8-milligram 9naloxone nasal spray doses, and associated operating expenses, 10including prior years' costs. 11    Section 100. The sum of $3,526,489, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 13business on June 30, 2025, from a reappropriation made for 14such purpose in Article 70, Section 115 of Public Act 15103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for 16Illinois' Future to the Department of Public Health for a 17grant to Carle Health Methodist Hospital for costs associated 18with its Job Readiness, Learning Program, and related 19operating expenses, including prior years' costs. 20    Section 105. The sum of $1,783,373, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 22business on June 30, 2025, from a reappropriation made for 23such purpose in Article 70, Section 120 of Public Act 24103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for   HB3916- 29 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1Illinois' Future to the Department of Public Health for a 2grant to Carle Health Methodist Hospital for costs associated 3with its Healthy Beginnings Program, and related expenses, 4including prior years' costs. 5    Section 110. The sum of $697,555, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of business 7on June 30, 2025, from a reappropriation made for such purpose 8in Article 70, Section 130 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 9is reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to the 10Department of Public Health for costs associated with the 11Firearms restraining order awareness, including prior years' 12costs. 13    Section 115. The sum of $3,356,895, or so much thereof as 14may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 15business on June 30, 2025, from a reappropriation made for 16such purpose in Article 70, Section 135 of Public Act 17103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for 18Illinois' Future to the Department of Public Health for 19expenses related to a safe gun storage public awareness 20campaign, including prior years' costs. 21    Section 120. The sum of $111,278, or so much thereof as may 22be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of business 23on June 30, 2025, from a reappropriation made for such purpose   HB3916- 30 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1in Article 70, Section 140 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 2is reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to the 3Department of Public Health for lung and colon cancer 4screening, including prior years' costs. 5    Section 125. The sum of $48,168, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of business 7on June 30, 2025, from a reappropriation made for such purpose 8in Article 70, Section 145 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 9is reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to the 10Department of Public Health for a grant to the Illinois 11chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics for the Reach 12Out and Read Program, including prior years' costs. 13    Section 130. The amount of $391,556, that was appropriated 14to the Department of Public Health from the General Revenue 15fund for a grant to the Illinois chapter of the American 16Academy of Pediatric for the Reach Out and Read Program in 17State Fiscal Year 2025 by Article 70, Section 146 of Public Act 18103-0589, as amended, or so much remains unexpended at the 19Close of business on June 30, 2025, is hereby reappropriated 20from the Fund for Illinois' Future to the Department of Public 21Health for a grant to the Illinois chapter of the American 22Academy of Pediatric for the Reach Out and Read Program. 23    Section 135. The sum of $3,000,000, or so much thereof as   HB3916- 31 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 2business on June 30, 2025, from a reappropriation made for 3such purpose in Article 70, Section 160 of Public Act 4103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for 5Illinois' Future to the Department of Public Health for making 6payments in support of the ordinary and contingent expenses of 7the following safety net hospitals to improve health equity, 8improve access to quality care, and reduce health disparities 9in underserved communities and that participate in the State's 10Medicaid managed care program at the following named amounts, 11including prior years' costs:12South Shore - Chicago...............................4,100,00013Roseland - Chicago..................................3,700,00014West Suburban - Oak Park............................3,450,00015Loretto - Chicago...................................2,000,00016Mount Sinai - Chicago...............................1,200,00017Touchette - Centreville.............................1,750,00018Jackson Park - Chicago..............................1,200,00019St. Bernard - Chicago...............................3,000,00020St. Anthony's Hospital - Chicago......................500,00021Thorek - Chicago......................................750,00022Humboldt Park - Chicago.............................1,000,00023Swedish - Chicago...................................1,250,00024AMITA Adventist - Glen Oaks - Glendale Heights......1,200,00025Holy Cross - Chicago................................1,325,00026La Rabida - Chicago.................................2,100,000  HB3916- 32 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1Insight - Chicago...................................2,750,0002Presence Mercy Center - Aurora........................450,0003Presence St. Mary and Elizabeth - Chicago.............300,0004St. Mary's Centralia................................1,750,0005Gateway Regional Medical Center - Granite City......1,000,0006Community First - Chicago...........................1,200,0007OSF St. Elizabeth - Ottawa..........................1,575,0008Methodist - Chicago...................................500,000 9    Section 140. The sum of $1,885,053, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 11business on June 30, 2025, from a reappropriation made for 12such purpose in Article 70, Section 165 of Public Act 13103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the Fund for 14Illinois' Future to the Department of Public Health for grants 15and administrative expenses for the distribution of PREP 16Medication Access, including prior years' costs. 17    Section 145. The sum of $28,279, or so much thereof as may 18be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of business 19on June 30, 2025, from a reappropriation made for such purpose 20in Article 70, Section 170 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 21is reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to the 22Department of Public Health for grants to certified Local 23Health Departments for Health Protection Programs including, 24but not limited to, infectious diseases, food sanitation,   HB3916- 33 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1potable water and private sewage, and related expenses, 2including prior years' costs. 3    Section 150. The sum of $50,438, or so much thereof as may 4be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of business 5on June 30, 2025, from a reappropriation made for such purpose 6in Article 70, Section 175 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, 7is reappropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to the 8Department of Public Health for grants and administrative 9expenses associated with STI screenings, including prior 10years' costs. 11    Section 155. The amount of $1,158,790, that was 12appropriated to the Department of Public Health from the 13General Revenue fund for making payments in support of the 14ordinary and contingent expenses of the following safety net 15hospitals to preserve their sustainability in accordance with 16the Safety-Net Hospital Health Equity and Access Leadership 17Grant Program authorized under Section 2310-715 of Department 18of Public Health Powers and Duties Law, as enacted in Public 19Act 102-886, and that participate in the State's Medicaid 20managed care program at the following named amounts:21  Insight Hospital and Medical Center..............$1,649,16022  Roseland Community Hospital......................$1,263,13023  South Shore Hospital.............................$2,645,36024  Touchette Regional Hospital......................$1,154,020  HB3916- 34 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1  OSF Saint Elizabeth Medical Center.................$743,8102  St. Mary's Hospital................................$882,4003  West Suburban Medical Center.....................$2,436,6004  St. Bernard Hospital...............................$251,8705  Holy Cross Hospital................................$211,1606  Ascension Mercy Medical Center.....................$276,3907in State Fiscal Year 2025 by Article 70, Section 180 of Public 8Act 103-0589, as amended, or so much remains unexpended at the 9Close of business on June 30, 2025, is hereby appropriated 10from the Fund for Illinois' Future to the Department of Public 11Health for making payments in support of the ordinary and 12contingent expenses of the following safety net hospitals to 13preserve their sustainability in accordance with the 14Safety-Net Hospital Health Equity and Access Leadership Grant 15Program authorized under Section 2310-715 of Department of 16Public Health Powers and Duties Law, as enacted in Public Act 17102-886, and that participate in the State's Medicaid managed 18care program at the following named amounts:19  Insight Hospital and Medical Center..............$1,649,16020  Roseland Community Hospital......................$1,263,13021  South Shore Hospital.............................$2,645,36022  Touchette Regional Hospital......................$1,154,02023  OSF Saint Elizabeth Medical Center.................$743,81024  St. Mary's Hospital................................$882,40025  West Suburban Medical Center.....................$2,436,60026  St. Bernard Hospital...............................$251,870  HB3916- 35 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1  Holy Cross Hospital................................$211,1602  Ascension Mercy Medical Center.....................$276,390 3    Section 160. The amount of $10,000,000, that was 4appropriated to the Department of Public Health from the 5General Revenue fund for making payments in support of the 6ordinary and contingent expenses of the following safety net 7hospitals to improve health equity, improve access to quality 8care, and reduce health disparities in underserved 9communities, in accordance with the Safety-Net Hospital Health 10Equity and Access Leadership Grant Program authorized under 11Section 2310-715 of Department of Public Health Powers and 12Duties Law, as enacted in Public Act 102-886, and that 13participate in the State's Medicaid managed care program at 14the following named amounts:15  Thorek Andersonville.............................$1,000,00016  Insight Hospital and Medical Center..............$7,150,00017  Roseland Community Hospital......................$9,000,00018  South Shore Hospital.............................$9,000,00019  Weiss Memorial Hospital..........................$2,000,00020  Touchette Regional Medical Center................$5,000,00021  Community First Medical Center...................$6,940,00022  OSF Saint Elizabeth Medical Center.................$750,00023  St. Mary's Hospital..............................$1,000,00024  ADVENT Medical Center GlenOaks.....................$646,60025  Thorek Memorial Hospital.........................$1,000,000  HB3916- 36 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1  West Suburban Medical Center.....................$4,000,0002  Jackson Park Hospital and Medical Center.........$2,301,7103  Humboldt Park Hospital...........................$1,000,0004  St. Bernard Hospital and Health Care Center......$5,000,0005  Loretto Hospital.................................$8,000,0006  Mount Sinai Hospital.............................$2,817,3307  Holy Cross Hospital..............................$1,000,0008  Swedish Covenant Hospital........................$3,000,0009  Ascension Mercy Medical Center.....................$825,00010in State Fiscal Year 2025 by Article 70, Section 181 of Public 11Act 103-0589, as amended, or so much remains unexpended at the 12Close of business on June 30, 2025, is hereby appropriated 13from the Fund for Illinois' Future to the Department of Public 14Health for making payments in support of the ordinary and 15contingent expenses of the following safety net hospitals to 16improve health equity, improve access to quality care, and 17reduce health disparities in underserved communities, in 18accordance with the Safety-Net Hospital Health Equity and 19Access Leadership Grant Program authorized under Section 202310-715 of Department of Public Health Powers and Duties Law, 21as enacted in Public Act 102-886, and that participate in the 22State's Medicaid managed care program at the following named 23amounts:24  Thorek Andersonville.............................$1,000,00025  Insight Hospital and Medical Center..............$7,150,00026  Roseland Community Hospital......................$9,000,000  HB3916- 37 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1  South Shore Hospital.............................$9,000,0002  Weiss Memorial Hospital..........................$2,000,0003  Touchette Regional Medical Center................$5,000,0004  Community First Medical Center...................$6,940,0005  OSF Saint Elizabeth Medical Center.................$750,0006  St. Mary's Hospital..............................$1,000,0007  ADVENT Medical Center GlenOaks.....................$646,6008  Thorek Memorial Hospital.........................$1,000,0009  West Suburban Medical Center.....................$4,000,00010  Jackson Park Hospital and Medical Center.........$2,301,71011  Humboldt Park Hospital...........................$1,000,00012  St. Bernard Hospital and Health Care Center......$5,000,00013  Loretto Hospital.................................$8,000,00014  Mount Sinai Hospital.............................$2,817,33015  Holy Cross Hospital..............................$1,000,00016  Swedish Covenant Hospital........................$3,000,00017  Ascension Mercy Medical Center.....................$825,000 18    Section 165. The amount of $1,000,000, that was 19appropriated to the Department of Public Health from the 20General Revenue fund for a grant to the Lake County Children's 21Advocacy Center in State Fiscal Year 2025 by Article 70, 22Section 185 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, or so much 23remains unexpended at the Close of business on June 30, 2025, 24is hereby appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' Future to 25the Department of Public Health for a grant to the Lake County   HB3916- 38 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1Children's Advocacy Center. 2    Section 170. The amount of $6,750,000, that was 3appropriated to the Department of Public Health from the 4General Revenue fund for a grant to the Illinois Association 5of Free and Charitable Clinics for the following, including 6prior year costs:7(1) Grants and other expenses of free and charitable clinics 8in Illinois that assist in or make referrals for prevention, 9vaccination, and testing of COVID-19.10(2) Grants and other expenses of free and charitable clinics 11that assist uninsured or underinsured people living with acute 12and chronic health issues through medical care, outreach, 13health education, screening and testing, oral health care and 14behavioral health services in State Fiscal Year 2025 by 15Article 70, Section 200 of Public Act 103-0589, as amended, or 16so much remains unexpended at the Close of business on June 30, 172025, is hereby appropriated from the Fund for Illinois' 18Future to the Department of Public Health for a grant to the 19Illinois Association of Free and Charitable Clinics for the 20following, including prior year costs:21(1) Grants and other expenses of free and charitable clinics 22in Illinois that assist in or make referrals for prevention, 23vaccination, and testing of COVID-19.24(2) Grants and other expenses of free and charitable clinics 25that assist uninsured or underinsured people living with acute   HB3916- 39 -OMB104 00043 TGT 10043 b1and chronic health issues through medical care, outreach, 2health education, screening and testing, oral health care and 3behavioral health services. 4ARTICLE 25    Section 5. The sum of $16,586,738, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, and remains unexpended at the close of 7business on June 30, 2025, from a reappropriation heretofore 8made for such purpose in Article 130, Section 335 of Public Act 9103-0589, as amended, is reappropriated from the State 10Coronavirus Urgent Remediation Fund to the Department of 11Public Health for all costs associated with response to the 12COVID-19 Pandemic. 13    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 142025.